Utah statutes.
20A-3-410.   Duty of election judges.
(1) (a)  Voting precinct election judges shall open envelopes containing
military or overseas citizen voter ballots that are in their custody on
election day at the polling places during the time the polls are open as
provided in this subsection.
(b)  The election judges shall:
(i)  first, open the outer envelope only; and
(ii)  unless the ballot is a disabled military or overseas citizen voter's
ballot, compare the signature of the military or overseas citizen voter on the
application with the signature on the registration and voting certificate.
(2) (a)  The judges shall register the military or overseas citizen voter to
vote if the voter is not already registered if the judges find that:
(i)  the registration and voting certificate appears to be executed in proper
form and contains information qualifying the military or overseas citizen
voter to be registered as a voter; and
(ii)  the signatures on the certificate and the application correspond, where
a comparison is required.
(b)  If the election judges determine that the registration and voting
certificate is insufficient or that the signatures do not correspond, they
shall:
(i)  disallow the registration; and
(ii)  without opening the ballot envelope, mark across the face of the
envelope "Rejected as defective because of __________ ." with the reason for
the rejection placed in the blank.
(c)  When a military or overseas citizen voter's name is entered upon the
registration books, the voter is considered to be registered and the
registration and voting certificate, signed and sworn to by the military or
overseas citizen voter on the back of the ballot envelope, together with his
name upon the registration books, constitute his registration record.
(d)  Nothing in this title may abridge the right of the military or overseas
citizen voter to be registered as provided in this section.
(3) (a)  After registering the voter, the judges shall carefully open the
ballot envelope so as not to destroy the information printed on it if they
find that:
(i)  the registration and voting certificate is sufficient; and
(ii)  the signatures on the certificate and the application correspond, where
a comparison is required.
(b)  The election judges shall:
(i)  remove the ballot from the envelope without unfolding it or permitting it
to be opened or examined;
(ii)  initial the stub in the same manner as for other ballots;
(iii)  deposit the ballot in the proper ballot box; and
(iv)  mark the official register and pollbook to show that the voter has
voted.
(c)  If the election judges determine that the registration and voting
certificate is insufficient or that the signatures do not correspond, they
shall:
(i)  disallow the vote; and
(ii)  without opening the ballot envelope, mark across the face of the
envelope "Rejected as defective because of __________ ." with the reason for
the rejection placed in the blank.
(4)  The election judges shall deposit the envelope, when the ballot is voted,
and the envelope with its contents unopened, when the absent vote is rejected,
in the ballot box containing the ballots.
(5)  The county clerk shall retain and preserve the envelopes in the manner
provided by law for the retention and preservation of official ballots voted
at that election.
